South Dakota, session 2026, SB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 25-7-6.10 be AMENDED:
25-7-6.10. Deviation from the schedule in § 25-7-6.2 must be considered if raised
by either party and made only upon the entry of specific findings based upon any of the
following factors:
(1) The income of a subsequent spouse or contribution of a third party to the income
or expenses of that parent but only if the application of the schedule works a
financial hardship on either parent;
(2) Any financial condition of either parent that would make application of the schedule
inequitable. If the total amount of the child support obligation, including any
adjustments for health insurance and child care costs, exceeds fifty percent of the
obligor's monthly net income, it is presumed that the amount of the obligation
imposes a financial hardship on the obligor. This presumption may be rebutted
based upon other factors set forth in this section;
(3) Any necessary education or health care special needs of the child;
(4) The effect of agreements between the parents regarding extra forms of support for
the direct benefit of the child;
(5) The obligation of either parent to provide for subsequent natural children, adopted
children, or stepchildren. However, an existing support order may not be modified
solely for this reason; or
(6) The voluntary and unreasonable act of a parent that causes the parent to be
unemployed or underemployed, consistent with the provisions of § 25-7-6.26; or
(7) The federal income tax consequences arising from claiming the child as a
dependent.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.